Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.060

Writ, to whom directed.

The writ may be directed to the inferior tribunal, board or officer, or to any other person having the custody of the record or proceedings to be certified. When directed to a tribunal the clerk, if there be one, must return the writ with the transcript required.

[ 1895 c 65 s 6; RRS s 1004.]